Washington statutes.
RCW 36.67.530

Form—Terms—Interest—Execution and signatures.

(1) When revenue bonds are issued for authorized purposes, said bonds shall be either registered as to principal only or as to principal and interest as provided in RCW 39.46.030, or shall be bearer bonds; shall be in such denominations, shall be numbered, shall bear such date, shall be payable at such time or times up to a maximum period of not to exceed thirty years and payable at the office of the county treasurer, and such other places as determined by the county legislative authority of the county; shall bear interest payable and evidenced to maturity on bonds not registered as to interest by coupons attached to said bonds bearing a coupon interest rate or rates as authorized by the county legislative authority; shall be executed by the chair of the county legislative authority, and attested by the clerk of the legislative authority, and the seal of such legislative authority shall be affixed to each bond, but not to any coupon; and may have facsimile signatures of the chair and the clerk imprinted on each bond and any interest coupons in lieu of original signatures and the facsimile seal imprinted on each bond.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4101; 1983 c 167 s 80; 1981 c 313 s 13; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 50; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 27; 1965 c 142 s 3.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Severability—1981 c 313: See note following RCW 36.94.020.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.